Washington statutes.
RCW 18.59.090

Renewal of licenses—Reinstatement of suspended or revoked licenses—Inactive status.

(1) Licenses under this chapter shall be renewed at the time and in the manner determined by the secretary and with the payment of a renewal fee. The board shall establish requirements for license renewal which provide evidence of continued competency. The secretary may provide for the late renewal of a license upon the payment of a late fee in accordance with its rules which may include additional continuing education or examination requirements.

(2) A suspended license is subject to expiration and may be renewed as provided in this section, but the renewal does not entitle the licensee, while the license remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the licensed activity, or in any other conduct or activity in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended. If a license revoked on disciplinary grounds is reinstated, the licensee, as a condition of reinstatement, shall pay the renewal fee and any applicable late fee.

(3) Any occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant licensed under this chapter not practicing occupational therapy or providing services may place his or her license in an inactive status. The secretary may prescribe requirements for maintaining an inactive status and converting from an inactive or active status.

[ 1991 c 3 s 155; 1990 c 13 s 1; 1984 c 9 s 10.]